Hawaii, session 2026, SB840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the use of chemical-based sunscreen is detrimental to the health of Hawaiʻi's coral reef ecosystems.  The National Ocean Service finds that the chemicals in both lotion and aerosol sunscreens can impair the growth of plants, stunt and deform animals, and contribute to the bleaching of coral.  In 2018, the legislature passed Senate Bill No. 2571, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1, signed into law as Act 104, that bans the sale, offer for sale, or distribution of any sunscreen in the State that contains oxybenzone or octinoxate, or both, without a medically-licensed prescription.  Recently, there have been additional efforts to expand the ban to include more chemicals, such as avobenzone and octocrylene, that negatively impact Hawaiʻi's fragile coral reefs.  However, opponents have expressed concerns with limited stock of approved sunscreens available on island for consumers, which has halted efforts to further protect Hawaiʻi's coral reefs. The legislature further finds that an alternative mineral-based sunscreen exists that protects consumers from skin cancer and does not harm the reef ecosystems. The first dispenser of this sunscreen in a Hawaiʻi state park was established in November 2021 at the Waialae section of Hāpuna state recreation area on the west coast of Hawaiʻi island.  The legislature also finds that the deployment of sunscreen dispensers at state beaches will ease the burden of securing reef-safe sunscreens for use by residents and visitors alike, as well as further protect Hawaiʻi's coral reef ecosystems. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Expand the use of the mineral-based sunscreen dispensers to all state beaches to decrease the amount of chemicals impacting Hawaiʻi's reef ecosystems; and (2)  Authorize the department of land and natural resources to contract or form a partnership with private parties, such as hotels, community organizations, and nonprofit organizations with an environmental protection mission, to assist in the maintenance and management of installed mineral‑based sunscreen dispensers at state beaches, as well as publicize that the mineral-based sunscreen in these dispensers is more protective of the coral reefs of the State. SECTION 2. The department of land and natural resources may contract or form a partnership with private parties, including hotels, community organizations, and nonprofit organizations with an environmental protection mission, to assist in the maintenance, management, and operation of installed mineral-based sunscreen dispensers at all state beaches, as well as publicize that the mineral-based sunscreen in these dispensers is more protective of the coral reefs of the State. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $100,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of land and natural resources to install, maintain, manage, and operate mineral-based sunscreen dispensers at all state beaches. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________